Louisiana, session 2026, SB432.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Arts. 603(18) and 612(A)(1) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 603. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
(18) "Neglect" means the refusal or unreasonable failure of a parent or
caretaker to supply the child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, care, treatment,
or counseling for any injury, illness, or condition of the child, as a result of which the
child's physical, mental, or emotional health, welfare, and safety is substantially
threatened or impaired. Neglect includes prenatal neglect. Consistent with Article
606(B), the inability of a parent or caretaker to provide for a child due to inadequate
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1122 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 432
financial resources shall not, for that reason alone, be considered neglect. Whenever,
in lieu of medical care, a child is being provided treatment in accordance with the
tenets of a well-recognized religious method of healing that has a reasonable, proven
record of success, the child shall not, for that reason alone, be considered to be
neglected or maltreated. However, nothing in this Subparagraph shall prohibit the
court from ordering medical services for the child when there is substantial risk of
harm to the child's health, welfare, or safety.
* * *
Art. 612. Assignment of reports for investigation and assessment
A. (1) Upon receiving a report of abuse or neglect of a child, who is not in
the custody of the state, the local child protection unit of the department shall
promptly assign a level of risk to the child based on the information provided by the
reporter. whether the information provided indicates that the child is in an
unsafe condition and if a potential threat of danger exists. The department shall
not make a determination of whether abuse or neglect has occurred prior to
investigating a report.
* * *